Massachusetts, session 194th, H1012.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 43A of chapter 21 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (f) the following subsection:-
(f½) The department, in consultation with the department of public health, shall establish
quality assurance project plan standards for the testing of water bodies and waterways for
bacteria or other pollutants following a discharge from a permittee’s combined sewage overflow
outfall.
Subject to appropriation, testing shall be conducted by the department, or its designee,
using the department’s quality assurance project plan, within a reasonable amount of time after a
combined sewage overflow notification as determined by the department based on the time
of 2

elapsed since the combined sewage overflow and the flow rate of the river. Testing shall be
conducted at multiple locations downstream from each combined sewage overflow outfall.
Testing may be suspended December through March based on weather conditions as determined
by the department.
The department shall compile the data from each combined sewage overflow and produce
a report in November of each year. The department, in consultation with the department of
public health, shall use this data to create a predictive model for post-combined sewage overflow
water quality.
The department shall use the data to determine areas with high bacteria content and shall
require any permittee with bacteria content over 235 colony forming units per 100 milliliters to
develop a combined sewage overflow mitigation plan, which the department shall be in charge of
approving. Permittees developing an approved mitigation plan shall be prioritized in state storm
water funding.
SECTION 2. Subsection (g) of said section 43A of said chapter 21, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by striking the first 2 paragraphs and inserting in place thereof the
following paragraph:-
Subject to appropriation, the department shall: require permittees to report the volume of
discharge from its outfall; assist permittees with installing accurate metering equipment to
measure discharge from its outfall; and issue public advisories within timeframes established by
subsections (c) and (d).
of 2